Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.590

State firearms background check system account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1163-S2.SL) ***

The state firearms background check system account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts under RCW 43.43.580 must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the creation, operation, and maintenance of the automated firearms background check system under RCW 43.43.580. Only the chief of the Washington state patrol or the chief's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2020 c 28 s 3.]